North Dakota, session 69, HB1212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 24-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
PFC. Henry Gurke memorial highway - State highway 18 - Continuing appropriation .
The department shall designate state highway 18 from the intersection of state highway 5 to the
Canadian border as the PFC. Henry Gurke memorial highway and shall place signs along the highway
designating that name. The department may accept any appropriate signs or funds donated to the
department for placement of the signs. Any donated funds are appropriated to the department on a
continuing basis for the purpose of providing signs designating state highway 18 as the PFC. Henry
Gurke memorial highway.

H. B. NO. 1212 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1212.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State